Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1714
Sheriff; disqualification; duties; county clerk shall perform.

Whenever any party, his agent or attorney shall make and file with the clerk of the proper court an affidavit stating that he believes the sheriff of such county will not, by reason of partiality, prejudice, consanguinity or interest, faithfully perform his duties in any suit commenced, or about to be commenced, in said court, the clerk shall direct the original or other process in such suit to the county clerk who shall execute the same in like manner as the sheriff might or ought to have done, and if like objections shall be made to the county clerk by either party, the court shall appoint some suitable person to whom such objection does not apply.

Laws 1881, c. 42, § 2, p. 222;

R.S.1913, § 5684;

Laws 1915, c. 101, § 1, p. 244;

C.S.1922, § 5014;

C.S.1929, § 26-1523;

R.S.1943, § 23-1714.

Affidavit being filed hereunder, sheriff is ipso facto disqualified from summoning jurors, but not from participating with court clerk in drawing panel from box containing jurors' names selected by county commissioners. Trobough v. State, 120 Neb. 453, 233 N.W. 452 (1930).

When showing is made conforming to above provisions, it is mandatory that clerk direct county clerk to perform the duties of the sheriff. Policky v. State, 113 Neb. 858, 205 N.W. 560 (1925).

A party must make his objection to sheriff's acting before trial or he will be held to have waived it. Coil v. State, 62 Neb. 15, 86 N.W. 925 (1901).